Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as “Kenny’s Law”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-34 of Title 2, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Livestock” means the same as defined in Section 1-3 of


Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


2. “Maintenance” means the functional checking, servicing,


repairing, or replacing of necessary infrastructure conducted by the

Req. No. 43 Page 1


property owner, utility company, municipality, or state or federal


agency.


B. All gates that are part of an enclosure or barrier designed


to contain livestock shall remain closed at all times, except when:


1. Ingress or egress is in progress; provided, that the ingress


or egress shall be reasonable and not prolonged as to allow persons


to enter and leave without causing containment of livestock to be


compromised;


2. Maintenance is occurring within the property;


3. Livestock are being moved from one area to another; or


4. The livestock owner, utility company, municipality, or any


state or federal agency has a functional reason to access the


enclosed area.


C. A person shall be in violation of this act if he or she


knowingly and maliciously:


1. Leaves a gate open that is part of an enclosure or barrier


designed to contain livestock on private or public property;


2. Damages any part of a gate that is part of an enclosure or


barrier designed to contain livestock, which compromises the


containment of livestock; or


3. Allows livestock to escape containment.


D. Individuals in violation of this act shall be deemed guilty


of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine


no more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each separate

Req. No. 43 Page 2


offense or imprisonment in a county jail for no more than one


hundred eighty (180) days for each separate offense, or by both fine


and imprisonment, for the first and second convictions. Third and


subsequent convictions for this violation shall be punished by no


more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each


separate offense or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than


one (1) year for each separate offense, or by both fine and


imprisonment. Individuals in violation of this section shall also


incur all financial liability from damages caused.


E. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry


shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this


act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-43 MR 1/16/2025 3:06:08 PM



















Req. No. 43 Page 3